Wisconsin, session 2025, SB450.
do enact as follows:SB450,11Section 1. 146.76 of the statutes is created to read:SB450,2,32146.76 Nonprofit agricultural organization health benefit coverage. 3(1) In this section:SB450,2,54(a) “Health care provider” means a health care provider under s. 146.81 (1) (a) 5to (p) that provides health care services within the provider’s scope of practice.SB450,2,96(b) “Nonprofit agricultural organization” means a member-directed 7agricultural organization whose purpose is to represent, protect, and enhance the 8business, economic, social, and educational interests of members located 9throughout the state and to which all of the following apply:SB450,3,311. The organization is described in section 501 (c) (5) of the Internal Revenue 2Code and is exempt from federal tax under section 501 (a) of the Internal Revenue 3Code.SB450,3,442. The organization is organized as a cooperative in this state under ch. 185.SB450,3,553. The organization was established prior to January 1, 1922.SB450,3,664. The organization collects annual dues from its members.SB450,3,875. The organization is governed by a board of directors that is elected by its 8members.SB450,3,1096. The organization has a wholly owned subsidiary through which health 10benefit coverage may be administered.SB450,3,1311(2) (a) Subject to par. (b) and sub. (3), a nonprofit agricultural organization 12may provide health benefit coverage for the sole benefit of its members and its 13members’ family.SB450,3,1614(b) No nonprofit agricultural organization may provide health benefit 15coverage unless the nonprofit agricultural organization offers health benefit 16coverage to its members in every county in the state.SB450,3,2217(3) (a) Before a nonprofit agricultural organization may provide health 18benefit coverage under sub. (2), the nonprofit agricultural organization shall file 19with the commissioner of insurance an attestation that the nonprofit agricultural 20organization qualifies as a nonprofit agricultural organization and that the 21nonprofit agricultural organization will offer health benefit coverage consistent 22with this section.SB450,4,823(b) Any nonprofit agricultural organization that offers to provide health 24benefit coverage under sub. (2) shall, no later than one year after filing an 1attestation under par. (a) and annually thereafter, file with the commissioner of 2insurance a signed opinion of a qualified actuary that the financial reserves of the 3nonprofit agricultural organization and any affiliated entities of the nonprofit 4agricultural organization are sufficient and conform to appropriate actuarial 5standards. Any nonprofit agricultural organization that fails to file a signed 6opinion pursuant to this paragraph may not provide health benefit coverage under 7sub. (2) until the nonprofit agricultural organization comes into compliance with 8this paragraph.SB450,4,159(4) If a nonprofit agricultural organization offers to provide health benefit 10coverage under sub. (2), the nonprofit agricultural organization shall, prior to 11enrollment, provide written notice to its members, and require a signature from its 12members acknowledging, that any health benefit coverage provided by the nonprofit 13agricultural organization is not health insurance and that the health benefit 14coverage alone may not satisfy individual or employer insurance coverage 15requirements under federal law.SB450,4,1916(5) No nonprofit agricultural organization that offers to provide health 17benefit coverage under sub. (2) may exclude or refuse to provide coverage for 18services provided by a health care provider if the health benefit coverage covers 19those services when provided by a physician licensed under subch. II of ch. 448.SB450,4,2320(6) No nonprofit agricultural organization that offers to provide health 21benefit coverage under sub. (2) may impose a preexisting condition exclusion for any 22condition for a period of more than 6 months if the health benefit coverage would 23otherwise include coverage of the condition.SB450,5,224(7) A nonprofit agricultural organization that offers to provide health benefit 1coverage under sub. (2) shall reinsure its risks under the health benefit coverage it 2provides with a company authorized to transact reinsurance business in this state.SB450,5,83(8) A nonprofit agricultural organization that offers to provide health benefit 4coverage under sub. (2) shall adopt a process for members to file and resolve 5complaints related to health benefit coverage that is, to the greatest extent 6practicable, consistent with the process for health insurance consumers to file and 7resolve complaints related to health insurance coverage with the office of the 8commissioner of insurance.SB450,29Section 2. 600.01 (1) (b) 14. of the statutes is created to read:SB450,5,1110600.01 (1) (b) 14. Nonprofit agricultural organization health benefit coverage 11and the nonprofit agricultural organization offering the coverage under s. 146.76.SB450,5,1212